Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska27-610
Rule 610. Religious beliefs or opinions.

Evidence of the beliefs or opinions of a witness on matters of religion is not admissible for the purpose of showing that by reason of their nature his credibility is impaired or enhanced.

Laws 1975, LB 279, § 43.